Maine, session 132, LD1630.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1102, sub-§4-A, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 618, §5, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §1102, sub-§4-C is enacted to read:
4-C. Forest climate resilience and carbon management plan. "Forest climate
resilience and carbon management plan" means a written document prepared by a licensed
professional forester that:
A. Describes activities to enhance, on forested land or farm woodland, climate
resilience or the storage or sequestration of forest carbon;
B. Identifies and describes specific activities, including specific silvicultural practices
recommended to meet the objectives described in paragraph A, including an adequate
scientific foundation for achieving those objectives;
C. Includes schedules, specific forest stand locations and acres and silvicultural
prescriptions for recommended practices; and
D. Includes a forest type map and locations of all water bodies and wetlands.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §1102, sub-§6, ¶C, as amended by PL 1989, c. 748, §1, is further
amended to read:
C. Promoting game management; or
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §1102, sub-§6, ¶D, as amended by PL 1989, c. 748, §1, is further
amended to read:
D. Preserving or enhancing wildlife or wildlife habitat.; or
Sec. 5. 36 MRSA §1102, sub-§6, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. Managing woodland for climate resilience or forest carbon storage and
sequestration.
Sec. 6. 36 MRSA §1102, sub-§10, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 619, §1 and amended
by PL 2011, c. 657, Pt. W, §5, is repealed.
Sec. 7. 36 MRSA §1102, sub-§11 is enacted to read:
11. Wildlife habitat. "Wildlife habitat" means land that is:
A. Managed for the enhancement or protection of aquatic or terrestrial wildlife species;
or
B. Subject to a written management agreement between the landowner and either the
Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife or the Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry to ensure that the habitat benefits provided by the land are
not lost. Management agreements may be revised or updated by mutual consent of
both parties at any time. Management agreements must be renewed at least every 10
years.
"Wildlife habitat" under this paragraph must also meet one of the following criteria:
(1) The land is designated by the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife as
supporting important wildlife habitat;
Page 1 - 132LR2008(01)

(2) The land supports the life cycle of any species of wildlife as identified by the
Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife;
(3) The land is identified by the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and
Forestry as supporting a natural vegetation community; or
(4) The land is designated as a resource protection area in a comprehensive plan,
zoning ordinance or zoning map.
Sec. 8. 36 MRSA §1102, sub-§12 is enacted to read:
12. Wildlife habitat management plan. "Wildlife habitat management plan" means
a written document prepared by a licensed professional forester or a wildlife biologist from
the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife that:
A. Describes activities to maintain or enhance wildlife habitat on a parcel;
B. Identifies and describes specific activities, including silvicultural and other
practices to meet the objectives described in paragraph A, including schedules, specific
natural community types or forest types, locations and acres and silvicultural
prescriptions; and
C. Includes a map of forest types or natural community types and locations of all water
bodies and wetlands.
Sec. 9. 36 MRSA §1106-A, as amended by PL 2017, c. 288, Pt. A, §43, is further
amended to read:
§1106-A. Valuation of open space land
1. Valuation method. For the purposes of this subchapter, the current use value of
open space land is the sale price that particular open space parcel would command in the
marketplace if it were required to remain in the particular category or categories of open
space land for which it qualifies under section 1102, subsection 6, adjusted by the certified
ratio.
2. Alternative valuation method. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, if an assessor is unable to determine the valuation of open space land under the
valuation method in subsection 1, the assessor may value that land under the alternative
method in this subsection. The assessor may reduce the ordinary assessed valuation of the
land, without regard to conservation easement restrictions and as reduced by the certified
ratio, by the cumulative percentage reduction for which the land is eligible according to the
following categories.
A. All open space land is eligible for a reduction of 20% 45%.
B. Permanently protected open space land is eligible for the reduction set in paragraph
A and an additional 30% 25%.
C. Forever wild open space land is eligible for the reduction set in paragraphs A and
B and an additional 20%.
D. Public access open space land is eligible for the applicable reduction set in
paragraph A, or B or C and an additional 25%.
E. Managed forest open space land is eligible for the reduction set in paragraphs A, B
and D and an additional 10%.
Page 2 - 132LR2008(01)

F. Open space land on which an approved wildlife habitat management plan has been
completed is eligible for the reduction set in paragraph A or D and an additional 25%.
A wildlife habitat management plan must be presented with the application for
enrollment of eligible acres but remains confidential and is not a public record as
defined in Title 1, section 402, subsection 3.
A wildlife habitat management plan presented with the application is subject to the
following conditions:
(1) The plan must have been reviewed and certified by a licensed professional
forester as consistent with sound silvicultural practices;
(2) The implementation of the silvicultural measures identified in the plan must
be supervised and certified by a licensed professional forester; and
(3) The plan must be updated at least once every 10 years. The updated plan must
include all information required in the original plan, including recommended
practices for the next planning period. The plan update must also include a review
and certification that practices recommended in the previous planning period have
been completed.
G. Open space land on which an approved forest climate resilience and carbon
management plan has been completed is eligible for the reduction set in paragraph A
or D and an additional 25%. A forest climate resilience and carbon management plan
must be presented with the application for enrollment of eligible acres but remains
confidential and is not a public record as defined in Title 1, section 402, subsection 3.
A forest climate resilience and carbon management plan presented with an application
is subject to the following conditions:
(1) The plan must have been reviewed and certified by a licensed professional
forester as consistent with sound silvicultural practices;
(2) The implementation of the silvicultural measures identified in the plan must
be supervised and certified by a licensed professional forester; and
(3) The plan must be updated at least once every 10 years. The updated plan must
include all information required in the original plan, including recommended
practices for the next planning period. The plan update must also include a review
and certification that practices recommended in the previous planning period have
been completed.
Notwithstanding this section, the value of forested open space land may not be reduced to
less than the value it would have under subchapter 2‑A, and the open space land valuation
may not exceed just value as required under section 701‑A.
3. Definition of land eligible for additional percentage reduction. The following
categories of open space land are eligible for the additional percentage reduction set forth
in subsection 2, paragraphs B, C, D, F and E G.
A. Permanently protected open space is an area of open space land that is eligible for
an additional cumulative percentage reduction in valuation because that area is subject
to restrictions prohibiting building development under a perpetual conservation
easement pursuant to Title 33, chapter 7, subchapter 8‑A or as an open space preserve
Page 3 - 132LR2008(01)

413 owned and operated by a nonprofit entity in accordance with section 1109, subsection
424 3, paragraph H.
B. Forever wild open space is an area of open space land that is eligible for an
additional cumulative percentage reduction in valuation because it is permanently
protected and subject to restrictions or committed to uses by a nonprofit entity in
accordance with section 1109, subsection 3, paragraph H that ensure that in the future
the natural resources on that protected property will remain substantially unaltered,
except for:
(1) Fishing or hunting;
(2) Harvesting shellfish in the intertidal zone;
(3) Prevention of the spread of fires or disease; or
(4) Providing opportunities for low-impact outdoor recreation, nature observation
and study.
C. Public access open space is an area of open space land, whether ordinary, or
permanently protected or forever wild, that is eligible for an additional cumulative
percentage reduction in valuation because public access is by reasonable means and
the applicant agrees to refrain from taking action to discourage or prohibit daytime,
nonmotorized and nondestructive public use. The applicant may permit, but is not
obligated to permit as a condition of qualification for public access status, hunting,
snowmobiling, overnight use or other more intensive outdoor recreational uses. The
applicant, without disqualifying land from status as public access open space, may
impose temporary or localized public access restrictions to:
(1) Protect active habitat of endangered species listed under Title 12, chapter 925,
subchapter 3;
(2) Prevent destruction or harm to fragile protected natural resources under Title
38, chapter 3, subchapter 1, article 5‑A; or
(3) Protect the recreational user from any hazardous area.
D. Managed forest open space land is an area of open space land whether ordinary,
permanently protected pursuant to paragraph A or public access pursuant to paragraph
C containing at least 10 acres of forested land that is eligible for an additional
cumulative percentage reduction in valuation because the applicant has provided proof
of a forest management and harvest plan. A forest management and harvest plan must
be prepared for each parcel of managed forest open space land and updated every 10
years. The landowner must comply with the forest management and harvest plan and
must submit every 10 years to the municipal assessor for parcels in a municipality or
the State Tax Assessor for parcels in the unorganized territory a statement from a
licensed professional forester that the landowner is managing the parcel according to
the forest management and harvest plan. Failure to comply with the forest management
and harvest plan results in the loss of the additional cumulative percentage reduction
under this paragraph for 10 years. The assessor or the assessor's duly authorized
representative may enter and examine the forested land and may examine any
information in the forest management and harvest plan submitted by the owner. A
copy of the forest management and harvest plan must be made available to the assessor
to review upon request. For the purposes of this paragraph, "to review" means to see
Page 4 - 132LR2008(01)

415 or possess a copy of a forest management and harvest plan for a reasonable amount of
426 time to verify that the forest management and harvest plan exists or to facilitate an
437 evaluation as to whether the forest management and harvest plan is appropriate and is
448 being followed. Upon completion of a review, the forest management and harvest plan
459 must be returned to the owner or an agent of the owner. A forest management and
560 harvest plan provided in accordance with this section is confidential and is not a public
571 record as defined in Title 1, section 402, subsection 3.
Sec. 10. 36 MRSA §1109, sub-§3, ¶O, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 619, §4 and
amended by PL 2011, c. 657, Pt. W, §5, is further amended to read:
O. Whether there is a written management agreement between the landowner and the
Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife or the Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry as described in section 1102, subsection 10 11.
Sec. 11. 36 MRSA §1114, as enacted by PL 1975, c. 726, §2, is amended to read:
§1114. Application
No person can A landowner may not apply for classification for more than an aggregate
total of 15,000 acres under this subchapter, unless the landowner is a nonprofit organization
that has been determined by the United States Internal Revenue Service to be exempt from
taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Code. The classification of farmland or open space
land hereunder shall continue under this subchapter continues until the municipal assessor,
or State Tax Assessor in the unorganized territory, determine determines that the land no
longer meets the requirements of such the classification.